Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB307.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 403.725 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A petition for an order of protection may be filed by:
(a) A victim of domestic violence and abuse; or
(b) An adult on behalf of a victim who is a minor otherwise qualifying for relief
under this subsection.
(2) The petition may be filed in the victim's county of residence or a county where the
victim has fled to escape domestic violence and abuse.
(3) The petition shall be verified and contain:
(a) The name, age, address, occupation, residence, and school or postsecondary
institution of the petitioner;
(b) The name, age, address, occupation, residence, and school or postsecondary
institution of the person or persons who have engaged in the alleged act or
acts complained of in the petition;
(c) The facts and circumstances which constitute the basis for the petition;
(d) The date and place of the marriage of the parties, if applicable; and
(e) The names, ages, and addresses of the petitioner's minor children, if
applicable.
(4) The petition shall be filed on forms prescribed by the Administrative Office of the
Courts and provided to the person seeking relief by the circuit clerk or by another
individual authorized by the court to provide and verify petitions in emergency
situations, such as law enforcement officers, Commonwealth's or county attorneys,
and regional rape crisis centers or domestic violence shelters.
(5) All petitions requested, completed, and signed by persons seeking protection under
this chapter shall be accepted and filed with the court.
(6) (a) Jurisdiction over petitions filed under this chapter shall be concurrent between
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/31/2025 2:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 194
the District Court and Circuit Court and a petition may be filed by a petitioner
in either court, except that a petition shall be filed in a family court if one has
been established in the county where the petition is filed.
(b) The Court of Justice shall provide a protocol for twenty-four (24) hour access
to orders of protection in each county with any protocol, whether statewide or
local, being subject to Supreme Court review and approval of the initial
protocol and any subsequent amendments. This protocol may allow for
petitions to be filed in or transferred to a court other than those specified in
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The Court of Justice may authorize by rule that petitions in a specific county
be filed in accordance with a supplemental jurisdictional protocol adopted for
that county. This protocol may provide for petitions to be filed in or
transferred to a court other than those specified in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(d) 1. In addition to the protocols for twenty-four (24) hour access established
under paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, before January 1, 2019,
the Court of Justice shall provide protocols for filing, including
electronic filing, of petitions for orders of protection at those regional
rape crisis centers designated under KRS 211.600, or regional domestic
violence shelters designated under KRS 209A.045, that elect to
participate in any county's twenty-four (24) hour access protocol.
2. These protocols shall be subject to Supreme Court review for approval
of the initial protocol and any subsequent amendments.
(7) Any judge to whom a petition is referred under subsection (6) of this section shall
have full authority to:
(a) Review and hear a petition; [and ]
(b) Subsequently grant and enforce an order of protection; and
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/31/2025 2:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 194
(c) In cases involving a question of paternity of a minor, make a determination
of paternity in the same manner as in KRS 406.021(2).
(8) If the judge of a court in which there is a pending request for modification or
enforcement of an existing order of protection is unavailable or unable to act within
a reasonable time, the proceedings may be conducted by any judge of the county in
accordance with court rules.
Section 2. KRS 403.740 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Following a hearing ordered under KRS 403.730, if a court finds by a
preponderance of the evidence that domestic violence and abuse has occurred and
may again occur, the court may issue a domestic violence order:
(a) Restraining the adverse party from:
1. Committing further acts of domestic violence and abuse;
2. Any unauthorized contact or communication with the petitioner or other
person specified by the court;
3. Approaching the petitioner or other person specified by the court within
a distance specified in the order, not to exceed five hundred (500) feet;
4. Going to or within a specified distance of a specifically described
residence, school, or place of employment or area where such a place is
located; and
5. Disposing of or damaging any of the property of the parties;
(b) Authorizing, at the request of the petitioner:
1. Limited contact or communication between the parties that the court
finds necessary; or
2. The parties to remain in a common area, which may necessitate them
being closer than five hundred (500) feet under limited circumstances
with specific parameters set forth by the court.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be interpreted to place any restriction or
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/31/2025 2:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 194
restraint on the petitioner;
(c) Directing or prohibiting any other actions that the court believes will be of
assistance in eliminating future acts of domestic violence and abuse, except
that the court shall not order the petitioner to take any affirmative action;
(d) Directing that either or both of the parties receive counseling services
available in the community in domestic violence and abuse cases; and
(e) Additionally, if applicable:
1. Directing the adverse party to vacate a residence shared by the parties to
the action;
2. In cases involving a question of the paternity of a minor, making a
determination of paternity in the same manner as in KRS 406.021(2);
3[2]. Utilizing the criteria set forth in KRS 403.270, 403.320, and 403.822,
grant temporary custody, subject to KRS 403.315;
4[3]. Utilizing the criteria set forth in KRS 403.211, 403.212, 403.2122, and
403.213, award temporary child support; and
5[4]. Awarding possession of any shared domestic animal to the petitioner.
(2) In imposing a location restriction described in subsection (1)(a)4. of this section, the
court shall:
(a) Afford the petitioner and respondent, if present, an opportunity to testify on
the issue of the locations and areas from which the respondent should or
should not be excluded;
(b) Only impose a location restriction where there is a specific, demonstrable
danger to the petitioner or other person protected by the order;
(c) Specifically describe in the order the locations or areas prohibited to the
respondent; and
(d) Consider structuring a restriction so as to allow the respondent transit through
an area if the respondent does not interrupt his or her travel to harass, harm, or
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/31/2025 2:01 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 194
attempt to harass or harm the petitioner.
(3) When temporary child support is granted under this section, the court shall enter an
order detailing how the child support is to be paid and collected. Child support
ordered under this section may be enforced utilizing the same procedures as any
other child support order.
(4) A domestic violence order shall be effective for a period of time fixed by the court,
not to exceed three (3) years, and may be reissued upon expiration for subsequent
periods of up to three (3) years each. The fact that an order has not been violated
since its issuance may be considered by a court in hearing a request for a reissuance
of the order.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/31/2025 2:01 PM Jacketed